src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-kevaet_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Adjectiviä - kevät: # adjectiviäs 'spring / kevät' - full paradigm
     kevät+N+Sg+Nom: kevät
     kevät+N+Sg+Gen: keviän
     kevät+N+Sg+Acc: [kevät, keviän]
     kevät+N+Sg+Par: kevätty
     kevät+N+Sg+Tra: keviäkse
     kevät+N+Sg+Abe: [keviätä, keviättäh]
     kevät+N+Sg+Com: keviänke
     kevät+N+Sg+Ine: keviäs
     kevät+N+Sg+Ela: [keviäspäi, keviäs]
     kevät+N+Sg+Ill: keviäh
     kevät+N+Sg+Ade: keviäl
     kevät+N+Sg+Abl: [keviälpäi, keviäl]
     kevät+N+Sg+All: keviäle
     kevät+N+Sg+Ess: keviänny
     kevät+N+Sg+Ter: keviässäh
     kevät+N+Sg+Apr: keviällyö
     kevät+N+Pl+Nom: keviät
     kevät+N+Pl+Gen: keviälöin
     kevät+N+Pl+Acc: keviät
     kevät+N+Pl+Par: keviälöi
     kevät+N+Pl+Tra: keviälöikse
     kevät+N+Pl+Abe: [keviälöittäh, keviälöitä]
     kevät+N+Pl+Com: keviälöinke
     kevät+N+Pl+Ine: keviälöis
     kevät+N+Pl+Ela: [keviälöis, keviälöispäi]
     kevät+N+Pl+Ill: keviälöih
     kevät+N+Pl+Ade: keviälöil
     kevät+N+Pl+Abl: [keviälöilpäi, keviälöil]
     kevät+N+Pl+All: keviälöile
     kevät+N+Pl+Ess: keviälöinny
     kevät+N+Pl+Ins: keviälöin
     kevät+N+Pl+Apr: keviälöillyö
     kevät+N+Sg+Nom+Clt/gi: kevätgi
     kevät+N+Sg+Gen+Clt/gi: keviängi
     kevät+N+Sg+Acc+Clt/gi: [kevätgi, keviängi]
     kevät+N+Sg+Par+Clt/gi: kevättygi
     kevät+N+Sg+Tra+Clt/gi: keviäksegi
     kevät+N+Sg+Abe+Clt/gi: [keviätägi, keviättähgi]
     kevät+N+Sg+Com+Clt/gi: keviänkegi
     kevät+N+Sg+Ine+Clt/gi: keviäsgi
     kevät+N+Sg+Ela+Clt/gi: [keviäspäigi, keviäsgi]
     kevät+N+Sg+Ill+Clt/gi: keviähgi
     kevät+N+Sg+Ade+Clt/gi: keviälgi
     kevät+N+Sg+Abl+Clt/gi: [keviälpäigi, keviälgi]
     kevät+N+Sg+All+Clt/gi: keviälegi
     kevät+N+Sg+Ess+Clt/gi: keviännygi
     kevät+N+Sg+Ter+Clt/gi: keviässähgi
     kevät+N+Sg+Apr+Clt/gi: keviällyögi
     kevät+N+Pl+Nom+Clt/gi: keviätgi
     kevät+N+Pl+Gen+Clt/gi: keviälöingi
     kevät+N+Pl+Acc+Clt/gi: keviätgi
     kevät+N+Pl+Par+Clt/gi: keviälöigi
     kevät+N+Pl+Tra+Clt/gi: keviälöiksegi
     kevät+N+Pl+Abe+Clt/gi: [keviälöitägi, keviälöittähgi]
     kevät+N+Pl+Com+Clt/gi: keviälöinkegi
     kevät+N+Pl+Ine+Clt/gi: keviälöisgi
     kevät+N+Pl+Ela+Clt/gi: [keviälöispäigi, keviälöisgi]
     kevät+N+Pl+Ill+Clt/gi: keviälöihgi
     kevät+N+Pl+Ade+Clt/gi: keviälöilgi
     kevät+N+Pl+Abl+Clt/gi: [keviälöilpäigi, keviälöilgi]
     kevät+N+Pl+All+Clt/gi: keviälöilegi
     kevät+N+Pl+Ess+Clt/gi: keviälöinnygi
     kevät+N+Pl+Ins+Clt/gi: keviälöingi
     kevät+N+Pl+Apr+Clt/gi: keviälöillyögi
